Wyoming, session 2026, HB0039.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-8-102(a) and (c) and
6-10-106(a)(iii), (iv) and by creating a new paragraph (v)
are amended to read:
6-8-102. Use or possession of firearm by person
convicted of certain felony and misdemeanor offenses;
penalties; exception.
(a) Any person who has previously pleaded guilty to
or been convicted of committing or attempting to commit a
violent felony, and has not been pardoned or has not had
the person's rights restored pursuant to W.S. 7-13-105(a)
or (f) or the laws of the jurisdiction in which the
conviction was entered and who uses or knowingly possesses
any firearm is guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of
not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.
(c) Any person who has previously pleaded guilty to
or been convicted of committing or attempting to commit a
felony that is not a violent felony and has not been
pardoned or has not had the person's rights restored
pursuant to W.S. 7-13-105(a) or (f) or the laws of the
jurisdiction in which the conviction was entered and who
uses or knowingly possesses any firearm is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than
six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00), or both.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 38, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
6-10-106. Rights lost by conviction of felony;
restoration.
(a) A person convicted of a felony is incompetent to
be an elector or juror or to hold any office of honor,
trust or profit within this state or to use or knowingly
possess any firearm, unless:
(iii) His rights are restored pursuant to W.S.
7-13-105(a) or (f); or
(iv) His rights as an elector are restored
pursuant to W.S. 7-13-105(b) and (c), in which case the
person shall remain incompetent to be a juror or to hold
any office of honor, trust or profit within this state;. or
(v) His rights to use and possess firearms are
restored pursuant to the laws of the jurisdiction in which
the conviction was entered. This paragraph shall not be
construed to restore rights to be an elector or juror or to
hold any office of honor, trust or profit, unless the laws
of the jurisdiction in which the conviction was entered
restore these rights.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0039
ENROLLED ACT NO. 38, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3